Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.12.020

Appointive officers—Duties—Compensation.

The appointive officers shall be those provided for by charter or ordinance and shall include a city clerk and a chief law enforcement officer. The office of city clerk may be merged with that of a city treasurer, if any, with an appropriate title designated therefor. Provision shall be made for obtaining legal counsel for the city, either by appointment of a city attorney on a full-time or part-time basis, or by any reasonable contractual arrangement for such professional services. The authority, duties and qualifications of all appointive officers shall be prescribed by charter or ordinance, consistent with the provisions of this title, and any amendments thereto, and the compensation of appointive officers shall be prescribed by ordinance: PROVIDED, That the compensation of an appointed municipal judge shall be within applicable statutory limits.

[ 1987 c 3 s 14; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.12.020.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 3: See note following RCW 3.70.010.